Washington statutes.
RCW 18.53.150

Violations generally—Penalty.

Any person violating this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1986 c 259 s 83; 1919 c 144 s 22; RRS s 10163. Prior: 1909 c 235 s 12.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.